Hawaii statutes.
§632-6 Provisions, remedial. This
chapter is declared to be remedial. Its purpose is to afford relief from the
uncertainty and insecurity attendant upon controversies over legal rights,
without requiring one of the parties interested so to invade the rights
asserted by the other as to entitle the party to maintain an ordinary action
therefor. It is to be liberally interpreted and administered, with a view to
making the courts more serviceable to the people. [L 1921, c 162, §6; RL 1925,
§2923; RL 1935, §4225; RL 1945, §9976; RL 1955, §228-6; HRS §632-6; gen ch
1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 27 H. 420, 424 (1923); 31 H. 720, 721 (1930).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next